Maryland, session 2025, HB0200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study School Bus Safety.
(b) The Governor shall appoint members of the Workgroup.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Maryland Department of Transportation, in consultation with the State
Department of Education, shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall study and identify issues related to safety for and
behavior of students and bus drivers on buses driven to or from a primary or secondary
school in the State.
(g) On or before June 30, 2026, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0200*

HOUSE BILL 200
recommendations to the governing body of each county and Baltimore City, each county
board of education, including Baltimore City, the Governor, and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.